Hawaii statutes.
[§806D-3] Authenticity of records;
verification; affidavit, declaration, or certification. (a) Upon written
request from the applicant or if ordered by the issuing court, the recipient of
criminal process shall verify the authenticity of records that the recipient
produces by providing an affidavit or declaration that complies with subsection
(b). The requirements of rule 902(11) of the Hawaii rules of evidence
regarding business records as evidence may be satisfied by an affidavit, or
declaration that complies with subsection (b), without the need for testimony
from the custodian of records, regardless of whether the business records were
produced by a foreign or Hawaii entity.

(b) To be admissible without testimony from
the custodian of records, a business record shall be accompanied by an
affidavit or declaration from its records custodian or other qualified person,
including contact information for the person completing the affidavit or
declaration and an attestation to the following:

(1) The person is the custodian of the record or sets
forth evidence that the witness is qualified to testify about the record;

(2) The record was made at or near the time of the
act, condition, or event set forth in the record by, or from information
transmitted by, an individual with knowledge of those matters;

(3) The record was kept in the course of the
regularly conducted activity;

(4) The record was made by the regularly conducted
activity as a regular practice;

(5) The identity of the record and the mode of its
preparation; and

(6) The record is either the original or a duplicate
that accurately reproduces the original.

(c) A party intending to offer a record into
evidence under this section shall provide written notice of that intention to
all adverse parties, and shall make the record and affidavit or declaration
available for inspection sufficiently in advance of the party's offer into
evidence to provide an adverse party with a fair opportunity to challenge the
party. A motion opposing admission in evidence of the record shall be made and
determined by the issuing court before trial and with sufficient time to allow
the party offering the record to, if the motion is granted, produce the
custodian of the record or other qualified person at trial, without creating
hardship on the party or on the custodian of the record or other qualified
person.

(d) Failure by a party to timely file a motion
under subsection (c) shall constitute a waiver of objection to admission of the
evidence, but the court for good cause shown may grant relief from the waiver.
If the court grants relief from the waiver, and thereafter determines the
custodian of the record shall appear, a continuance of the trial may be granted
to provide the proponent of the record sufficient time to arrange for the
necessary witness to appear.

(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude
either party from calling the custodian of the record or other witness to
testify regarding the record. [L 2012, c 325, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next